Nevada, session 83, SB370.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 489.481 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.481 The Division shall adopt regulations providing fees
for:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
1. Certificates of installation;
2. Labels of installation;
3. Certificates of compliance;
4. Labels of compliance;
5. Certificates of title [;] , including, without limitation, a fee
for the expedited process for the issuance of a certificate of title
required by NRS 489.585;
6. Licenses of manufacturers, dealers, distributors,
salespersons, responsible managing employees, general
servicepersons and specialty servicepersons;
7. Licenses for branch offices; and
8. Any other services provided by the Division.
Sec. 2. NRS 489.561 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.561 1. Whenever an application is made to the Division
for title of a manufactured home, mobile home or commercial coach
previously titled and the applicant is unable to present the certificate
of title previously issued because it is lost or being unlawfully
detained by one in possession or is not otherwise available, the
Division may receive the application and examine the circumstances
of the case and require the filing of affidavits or other information.
[When]
2. Within 45 days after the date on which the Division [is
satisfied that the applicant is entitled to a certificate of title, or
pursuant to NRS 489.562, it may issue the] receives the application
and any information required pursuant to subsection 1, the
Division shall:
(a) Issue to the applicant a new certificate [on] of title for the
manufactured home, mobile home or commercial coach [.] if the
Division is satisfied that the applicant is entitled to the certificate;
or
(b) Deny the application. If the Division denies the application,
the Division shall provide written notification of the denial and the
reasons for the denial to the applicant within 10 days after the
denial.
Sec. 3. NRS 489.562 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.562 1. If [an applicant] the application of a person who
is seeking a certificate of title [is unable to provide the information
required by the Division] pursuant to NRS 489.561 [and satisfy the
Division that the applicant is entitled to a certificate of title pursuant
to that section,] is denied, the [applicant] person may [obtain] :
(a) Submit an application for a new certificate of title [from] to
the Division [by:
(a) Filing] pursuant to this section;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(b) File a bond with the Division that meets the requirements of
subsection [3;] 4; and
[(b) Allowing]
(c) Allow the Division to inspect the manufactured home,
mobile home or commercial coach for compliance with the safety
standards and other requirements provided in regulations adopted by
the Administrator pursuant to NRS 489.251.
2. Within 45 days after the date on which the Division
receives an application and bond pursuant to paragraphs (a) and
(b) of subsection 1 and completes the inspection required pursuant
to paragraph (c) of subsection 1, the Division shall:
(a) Issue to the applicant a new certificate of title for the
manufactured home, mobile home or commercial coach if the
Division finds that:
(1) The bond meets the requirements of subsection 4; and
(2) The manufactured home, mobile home or commercial
coach complies with the standards and other requirements set
forth in paragraph (c) of subsection 1; or
(b) Deny the application. If the Division denies the application,
the Division shall provide written notification of the denial and the
reasons for the denial to the applicant within 10 days after the
denial.
3. Any person damaged by the issuance of a certificate of title
pursuant to this section has a right of action to recover on the bond
for any breach of its conditions, except the aggregate liability of the
surety to all persons must not exceed the amount of the bond.
[3.] 4. The bond required pursuant to subsection 1 must be:
(a) In a form prescribed by the Division;
(b) Executed by the applicant as principal and by a corporation
qualified under the laws of this State as surety;
(c) In an amount equal to one and one-half times the most recent
assessed value assigned by the relevant county assessor to the
manufactured home, mobile home or commercial coach; and
(d) Conditioned to indemnify any:
(1) Prior owner or lienholder of the manufactured home,
mobile home or commercial coach, and his or her successors in
interest;
(2) Subsequent purchaser of the manufactured home, mobile
home or commercial coach, and his or her successors in interest; or
(3) Person acquiring a security interest in the manufactured
home, mobile home or commercial coach, and his or her successors
in interest,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
 against any expense, loss or damage because of the issuance of
the certificate of title or because of any defect in or undisclosed
security interest in the applicant’s right or title to the manufactured
home, mobile home or commercial coach or the applicant’s interest
in the manufactured home, mobile home or commercial coach.
[4.] 5. A right of action does not exist in favor of any person
by reason of any action or failure to act on the part of the Division
or any officer or employee thereof in carrying out the provisions of
this section, or in giving or failing to give any information
concerning the legal ownership of a manufactured home, mobile
home or commercial coach or the existence of a certificate of title
obtained pursuant to this section.
Sec. 4. NRS 489.585 is hereby amended to read as follows:
489.585 The Administrator shall adopt regulations pertaining
to:
1. The establishment of an expedited process for the issuance
of a certificate of title pursuant to NRS 489.561 or 489.562;
2. The issuance of a certificate of title pursuant to NRS
489.562; and
[2.] 3. The issuance and revocation of a certificate of title in
beneficiary form and a change in beneficiary for such a certificate of
title pursuant to NRS 489.564.
Sec. 5. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 2 and 3 of this act become effective on October 1,
2025.
3. Sections 1 and 4 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)